Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,149
Bonds; contracts; acceptance of United States guarantee.

Any irrigation or drainage district, heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Nebraska for irrigation or drainage purposes, is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into contract with the United States of America whereby the bonds of the district are guaranteed by the United States or financial credit is extended by the United States to the district, and for the sale, purchase or use of any canal, ditch, reservoir, rights-of-way, irrigation or drainage systems or other property owned or to be acquired for the use of such district.

Laws 1915, c. 207, § 1, p. 461;

C.S.1922, § 2949;

C.S.1929, § 46-206;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,149.